Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-133
Approved courses of study; approval required.

The department shall maintain a list of approved courses of study for the professions which are regulated by the Uniform Credentialing Act. The appropriate board shall make recommendations relative thereto and shall approve the list for its profession. The department shall approve the list for a profession if there is no appropriate board. No course of study shall be approved without the formal action of the department or the appropriate board. Any course of study whose graduates or students desire to take the Nebraska examination shall supply the department with the necessary data to allow the board and the department to determine whether that course of study should be approved.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 28, p. 461;

C.S.1929, § 71-404;

R.S.1943, § 71-128;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 37;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 29;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 31;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-128;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 33.